Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1250
Securities in custody of State Treasurer; held in name of nominee; registered nominee; selection.

All securities purchased or held shall be in the custody of the State Treasurer who may deposit with a fiscal agent in any financial institution, approved by the Nebraska Investment Council, such securities as he shall consider advisable to be held in safekeeping by such agent for collection of principal and interest, or of the proceeds of sale thereof or, at the direction of the state investment officer, the State Treasurer shall have such securities held in the name of a nominee. The State Treasurer shall join with the deputy state treasurer in obtaining for the State of Nebraska a registered nominee from the American Society of Corporate Secretaries and shall hold securities registered in the nominee's name in the same manner as he shall consider appropriate for holding other securities.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 14, p. 2354;

Laws 1974, LB 925, § 1.